District of Columbia statutes.
8-103.14

Use of sludge from treatment facilities.

(a)

The Mayor may review and, as appropriate, approve studies, plans and specifications, operating manuals, and procedures for the disposal or use of sludge from treatment facilities and shall issue construction or operation permits.

(b)

If the use of the sludge involves distribution to the public, then a distribution permit will also be required specifying the quality control and health protection conditions which must be met prior to distribution.

(c)

For sludge originating outside of the District, a permit by reciprocity may be issued based upon an evaluation of the regulations of the originating state.

Mar. 16, 1985, D.C. Law 5-188, § 15, 32 DCR 919
1981 Ed., § 6-934.